Mississippi, session 2026, SB2762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 19-5-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-17.  After December 31, 1992, the board of supervisors of any county in the state shall provide for the collection and disposal of garbage and the disposal of rubbish, and for that purpose is required to establish, operate and maintain a garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems; to acquire property, real or personal, by contract, gift or purchase, necessary or proper for the maintenance and operation of such system; to make all necessary rules and regulations for the collection and disposal of garbage and/or rubbish and, if it so desires, to establish, maintain and collect rates, fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish; and, in its discretion, to enter into contracts, in the manner required by law, with individuals, associations or corporations for the establishment, operation and maintenance of a garbage and rubbish disposal system or systems, and/or to enter into contracts on such terms as the board of supervisors thinks proper with any municipality, other county or region, enabling the county to use jointly with such municipality, other county or region any collection system, authorized rubbish landfill or permitted sanitary landfill operated by the municipality, other county or region.  The board of supervisors shall designate by order the area to be served by the system.  All persons in the county generating garbage shall utilize a garbage collection and disposal system.  However, this provision shall not prohibit any person from managing solid waste generated by such person in any municipal solid waste management facility owned by the generator. As a necessary incident to such county's power and authority to establish, maintain and collect such rates, fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and as a necessary incident to such county's power and authority to establish, operate and maintain a garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems, the board of supervisors of such county shall have the authority to initiate a civil action to recover any delinquent fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, in the event any person, firm or corporation, including any municipal corporation, shall fail or refuse to pay such fees and charges for collecting and disposing of garbage and/or rubbish; provided that such board of supervisors may initiate such a civil action to recover such delinquent fees and charges whether or not such county has previously entered into a contract with such individual, firm or corporation, including a municipal corporation, relating to the establishment, operation and maintenance of such garbage and/or rubbish disposal system or systems; provided, further, that in a civil action to recover such delinquent fees and charges for collecting and disposing of such garbage and/or rubbish, and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, the county shall in all respects be a proper party to such suit as plaintiff and shall have the power to sue for and recover such unpaid fees and charges and all administrative and legal costs associated with collecting such fees and charges, from any person, firm or corporation, including a municipal corporation, as may fail, refuse or default in the payment of such fees and charges. SECTION 2.  Section 19-5-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-21.  (1)  (a)  Except as provided in paragraphs (b), (c), (d) and (g) of this subsection, the board of supervisors, to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 19-5-17, may levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed four (4) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system.  The service area may be comprised of unincorporated or incorporated areas of the county or both; however, no property shall be subject to this levy unless that property is within an area served by a county's garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system. (b)  The board of supervisors of any county wherein Mississippi Highways 35 and 16 intersect and having a land area of five hundred eighty-six (586) square miles may levy, in its discretion, for the purposes of establishing, operating and maintaining a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, an ad valorem tax not to exceed six (6) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the system as set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (c)  The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Mississippi River and traversed by U.S. Highway 61, and which is intersected by Mississippi Highway 4, having a population of eleven thousand eight hundred fifty-four (11,854) according to the 1970 federal census, and having an assessed valuation of Fourteen Million Eight Hundred Seventy-two Thousand One Hundred Forty-four Dollars ($14,872,144.00) in 1970, may levy, in its discretion, for the purposes of establishing, operating and maintaining a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, an ad valorem tax not to exceed six (6) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the system as set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (d)  The board of supervisors of any county having a population in excess of two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the latest federal decennial census, and in which Interstate Highway 55 and Interstate Highway 20 intersect, may levy, in its discretion, for the purposes of establishing, operating and maintaining a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system, an ad valorem tax not to exceed seven (7) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the system as set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection. (e)  The proceeds derived from any additional millage levied pursuant to paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection in excess of two (2) mills shall be excluded from the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321 for the first year of such additional levy and shall be included within such limitation in any year thereafter.  The proceeds from any millage levied pursuant to paragraph (g) shall be excluded from the ten percent (10%) increase limitation under Section 27-39-321 for the first year of the levy and shall be included within the limitation in any year thereafter. (f)  The rate of the ad valorem tax levied under this section shall be shown as a line item on the notice of ad valorem taxes on taxable property owed by the taxpayer. (g)  In lieu of the ad valorem tax authorized in paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (d) of this subsection, the fees authorized in subsection (2) of this subsection and in Section 19-5-17 or any combination thereof, the board of supervisors may levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed six (6) mills to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 19-5-17 on all taxable property within the area served by the system as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection. Any board of supervisors levying the ad valorem tax authorized in this paragraph (g) is prohibited from assessing or collecting fees for the services provided under the system. (2)  In addition to the ad valorem taxes authorized in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection (1) or in lieu of any other method authorized to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 19-5-17, the board of supervisors of any county with a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system may assess and collect fees to defray the costs of the services.  The board of supervisors may assess and collect the fees from each single family residential generator of garbage or rubbish.  The board of supervisors also may assess and collect the fees from each industrial, commercial and multifamily residential generator of garbage or rubbish for any time period that the generator has not contracted for the collection of garbage and rubbish that is ultimately disposed of at a permitted or authorized nonhazardous solid waste management facility.  The fees assessed and collected under this subsection may not exceed, when added to the proceeds derived from any ad valorem tax imposed under this section and any special funds authorized under subsection (7), the actual costs estimated to be incurred by the county in operating the county garbage and rubbish collection and disposal system.  In addition to such fees, an additional amount not to exceed up to One Dollar ($1.00) or ten percent (10%) per month, whichever is greater, on the current monthly bill may be assessed and collected on the balance of any delinquent monthly fees. (3)  (a)  Before the adoption of any order to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees authorized by this section, the board of supervisors shall publish a notice advertising their intent to adopt an order to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees authorized by this section.  The notice shall specify the purpose of the proposed increase, the proposed percentage increase and the proposed percentage increase in total revenues for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal services or shall contain a copy of the resolution by the board stating their intent to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees. The notice shall be published in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county for no less than three (3) consecutive weeks before the adoption of the order.  The notice shall be in print no less than the size of eighteen (18) point and shall be surrounded by a one-fourth (1/4) inch black border.  The notice shall not be placed in the legal section notice of the newspaper.  There shall be no language in the notice stating or implying a mandate from the Legislature. (b)  In addition to the requirement for publication of notice, the board of supervisors shall notify each person furnished garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service of any increase in the ad valorem tax assessment or fees.  In the case of an increase of the ad valorem tax assessment, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first ad valorem tax bill on which the increased assessment is effective.  In the case of an increase in fees, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first bill for fees on which the increased fees or charges are assessed.  There shall be no language in any notice stating or implying a mandate from the Legislature. (4)  The board of supervisors of each county shall adopt an order determining whether or not to grant exemptions, either full or partial, from the fees for certain classes of generators of garbage or rubbish.  If a board of supervisors grants any exemption, it shall do so in accordance with policies and procedures, duly adopted and entered on its minutes, that clearly define those classes of generators to whom the exemptions are applicable.  The order granting exemptions shall be interpreted consistently by the board when determining whether to grant or withhold requested exemptions. (5)  (a)  The board of supervisors in any county with a garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system only for residents in unincorporated areas may adopt an order authorizing any single family generator to elect not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system.  If the board of supervisors adopts an order, the head of any single family residential generator may elect not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service by filing with the chancery clerk the form provided for in this subsection before December 1 of each year.  The board of supervisors shall develop a form that shall be available in the office of the chancery clerk for the head of household to elect not to use the service and to accept full responsibility for the disposal of his garbage or rubbish in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations.  The board of supervisors, following consultation with the Department of Environmental Quality, shall develop and the chancery clerk shall provide a form to each person electing not to use the service describing penalties under state and federal law and regulations for improper or unauthorized management of garbage.  Notice that the election may be made not to use the county service by filing the form with the chancery clerk's office shall be published in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the county for no less than three (3) consecutive weeks, with the first publication being made no sooner than five (5) weeks before the first day of December.  The notice shall state that any single family residential generator may elect not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service by the completion and filing of the form for that purpose with the chancery clerk's office before December 1 of that year.  The notice shall also include a statement that any single family residential generator who does not timely file the form shall be assessed any fees levied to cover the cost of the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service.  The chancery clerk shall maintain a list showing the name and address of each person who has filed a notice of intent not to use the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service. (b)  If the homestead property of a person lies partially within the unincorporated service area of a county and partially within the incorporated service area of a municipality and both the municipality and the county provide garbage collection and disposal service to that person, then the person may elect to use either garbage collection and disposal service.  The person shall notify the clerk of the governing authority of the local government whose garbage collection and disposal service he elects not to use of his decision not to use such services by certified mail, return receipt requested.  The person shall not be liable for any fees or charges from the service he elects not to use. (6)  The board may borrow money for the purposes of defraying the expenses of the system in anticipation of: (a)  The tax levy authorized under this section; (b)  Revenues resulting from the assessment of any fees for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal; or (c)  Any combination thereof. (7)  In addition to the fees or ad valorem millage authorized under this section, a board of supervisors may use monies from any special funds of the county that are not otherwise required by law to be dedicated for use for a particular purpose in order to defray the costs of the county garbage or rubbish collection or disposal system. SECTION 3.  Section 19-5-22, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 19-5-22.  (1)  Fees for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal shall be assessed jointly and severally against the generator of the garbage or rubbish and against the owner of the property furnished the service.  In addition to such fees, an additional amount not to exceed up to One Dollar ($1.00) or ten percent (10%) per month, whichever is greater, on the current monthly bill may be assessed on the balance of any delinquent monthly fees.  Any person who pays, as a part of a rental or lease agreement, an amount for garbage or rubbish collection or disposal services shall not be held liable upon the failure of the property owner to pay those fees. (2)  (a)  Every generator assessed the fees authorized by Section 19-5-21 and the owner of the property occupied by that generator shall be jointly and severally liable for the fees. (b)  Subject to subsection (6) of this section, the fees shall be a lien upon the real property offered garbage or rubbish collection or disposal service. (c)  (i)  The board of supervisors may assess the fees annually.  If the fees are assessed annually, the fees for each calendar year shall be a lien upon the real property beginning on January 1 of the next immediately succeeding calendar year subject to subsection (6) of this section.  The person or entity owing the fees, upon signing a form provided by the board of supervisors, may pay the fees in equal installments. (ii)  If fees are assessed on a basis other than annually, the fees shall become a lien upon the real property offered the service on the date that the fees become due and payable subject to subsection (6) of this section. No real or personal property shall be sold to satisfy any lien imposed under this subsection (2). (d)  The county shall mail a notice of the lien, including the amount of unpaid fees and a description of the property subject to the lien, to the owner of the property. (3)  Liens created under subsection (2) may be discharged by filing with the chancery clerk a receipt or acknowledgement, signed by the designated county official or billing and collection entity, that the lien has been paid or discharged. (4)  (a)  The board of supervisors may notify the tax collector of any unpaid fees assessed under Section 19-5-21 within ninety (90) days after the fees are due.  Before notifying the tax collector, the board of supervisors shall provide notice of the delinquency to the person who owes the delinquent fees and shall afford an opportunity for a hearing, that complies with the due process protections the board deems necessary, consistent with the Constitutions of the United States and the State of Mississippi.  The board of supervisors shall establish procedures for the manner in which notice shall be given and the contents of the notice; however, each notice shall include the amount of fees and shall prescribe the procedure required for payment of the delinquent fees.  The board of supervisors may designate a hearing officer either from among its own membership, from the staff of the county or some other qualified and impartial person, but in no event shall the hearing officer be the attorney for the board of supervisors or a staff member of the tax collector's office.  No hearing officer may have an interest in the outcome of a hearing, nor may a hearing officer be related to a board member or the person who owes delinquent fees.  The board of supervisors shall continue to update the delinquency notice to the tax collector at least once per quarter of each year. (b)  Upon receipt of a delinquency notice, the tax collector shall not issue or renew a motor vehicle road and bridge privilege license for any motor vehicle owned by a person who is delinquent in the payment of fees unless those fees in addition to any other taxes or fees assessed against the motor vehicle are paid.  Payment of all delinquent garbage fees shall be deemed a condition of receiving a motor vehicle road and privilege license tag. (c)  The tax collector may forward the motor vehicle road and privilege license tag renewal notices to the designated county official or entity that is responsible for the billing and collection of the county garbage fees.  The designated county official or the billing and collection entity shall identify those license tags that shall not be issued due to delinquent garbage fees.  The designated county official or the billing and collection entity shall stamp a message on the license tag renewal notices that the tag will not be renewed until delinquent garbage fees are paid.  The designated county official or the billing and collection entity shall return the license tag notices to the tax collector before the first of the month. (d)  Any appeal from a decision of the board of supervisors under this section regarding payment of delinquent garbage fees may be taken as provided in Section 11-51-75. (5)  The board of supervisors may levy the garbage fees as a special assessment against the property in lieu of the lien authorized in this section.  The board of supervisors shall certify to the tax collector the assessment due from the owner of the property.  The tax collector shall enter the assessment upon the annual tax roll of the county and shall collect the assessment at the same time he collects the county ad valorem taxes on the property. No real or personal property shall be sold to satisfy any assessment imposed under this subsection (5). (6)  Liens created under this statute shall be contained in the chancery clerk's office in a separate hard copy book format and/or a digital format and shall include all information necessary for the recording and indexing therein.  The registry created herein shall be created on or before January 1, 2024. SECTION 4.  Section 21-19-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-19-2.  (1)  (a)  To defray the cost of establishing, operating and maintaining the system provided for in Section 21-19-1, the governing authority of a municipality may develop a system for the billing and/or collection of any fees or charges imposed on each person furnished garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service by the municipality or at the expense of the municipality.  The governing authority of the municipality shall provide for the collection of the fees or charges. (b)  The governing authority of a municipality may enter into a contract upon mutual agreement with a public or private corporation, nonprofit corporation, planning and development district or a public agency, association, utility or utility district within the area receiving garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services from the municipality for the purpose of developing, maintaining, operating and administering a  system for the billing and/or collection of fees or charges imposed by the municipality for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services.  The entity with whom the governing authority of a municipality contracts shall notify the governing authority of the municipality monthly of any unpaid fees or charges assessed under this section.  Any entity that contracts to provide a service to customers, within the area being served by the municipality's garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system, may provide a list of its customers to the governing authority of the municipality upon the request of the governing authority. (2)  (a)  To defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 21-19-1, the governing body of a municipality may levy an ad valorem tax not to exceed four (4) mills on all taxable property within the area served by the municipality's garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system.  The service area may be comprised of incorporated and/or unincorporated areas within a county; however, no property shall be subject to this levy unless that property is within an area served by a municipality's garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system.  The rate of the ad valorem tax levied under this section shall be shown as a line item on the notice of ad valorem taxes on taxable property owed by the taxpayer. (b)  In addition to or in lieu of any other method authorized to defray the cost of establishing and operating the system provided for in Section 21-19-1, the governing body of a municipality that has established a garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal system may assess and collect fees or charges to defray the costs of such services.  The governing authority may assess and collect the fees or charges from each single family residential generator of garbage and/or rubbish.     The governing authority also may assess and collect such fees or charges from each industrial, commercial and multi-family residential generator of garbage and/or rubbish for any time period that the generator has not otherwise contracted for the collection of garbage and/or rubbish that is ultimately disposed of at a permitted or authorized nonhazardous solid waste management facility. (c)  Before the adoption of any resolution or ordinance to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section, the governing authority of a municipality shall have published a notice advertising their intent to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section.  The notice shall specify the purpose of the proposed increase, the proposed percentage increase and the proposed percentage increase in total revenues for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services or shall contain a copy of any resolution by the governing authority stating their intent to increase the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section.  The notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality for no less than three (3) consecutive weeks before the adoption of the order.  The notice shall be in print no less than the size of eighteen (18) point and shall be surrounded by a one-fourth (1/4) inch black border.  The notice shall not be placed in the legal section notice of the newspaper.  There shall be no language in the notice inferring a mandate from the Legislature. In addition to the requirement for publication of notice, the governing authority of a municipality shall notify each person furnished garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service of any increase in the ad valorem tax assessment or fees or charges authorized by this section.  In the case of an increase of the ad valorem tax assessment, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first ad valorem tax bill on which the increased assessment is effective.  In the case of an increase in fees or charges, a notice shall be conspicuously placed on or attached to the first bill for fees or charges on which the increased fees or charges are assessed.  There shall be no language in any notice inferring a mandate from the Legislature. (d)  The governing authority of a municipality may adopt an ordinance authorizing the granting of exemptions from the fees or charges for certain generators of garbage and/or rubbish.  The ordinance shall define clearly those generators that may be exempted and shall be interpreted consistently by the governing authority when determining whether to grant or withhold requested exemptions. (e)  The governing authority may borrow money for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the system in anticipation of: (i)  The tax levy authorized under this section; (ii)  Revenues resulting from the assessment of any fees or charges for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal; or (iii)  Any combination thereof. (3)  (a)  Fees or charges for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal shall be assessed jointly and severally against the generator of the garbage and/or rubbish and against the owner of the property furnished the service.  However, any person who pays, as a part of a rental or lease agreement, an amount for garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal services shall not be held liable upon the failure of the property owner to pay such fees. (b)  Every generator assessed the fees or charges provided for and limited by this section and the owner of the property occupied by that generator shall be jointly and severally liable for the fees and/or charges so assessed.  The fees or charges shall be a lien upon the real property offered garbage and/or rubbish collection and/or disposal service. At the discretion of the governing body of the municipality, fees or charges assessed for the service may be assessed annually.  If fees or charges are assessed annually, the fees or charges for each calendar year shall be a lien upon the real property offered the service beginning on January 1 of the next immediately succeeding calendar year.  The person or entity owing the fees or charges, upon signing a form provided by the governing authority, may pay the fees or charges in equal installments. If fees or charges so assessed are assessed on a basis other than annually, the fees or charges shall become a lien on the real property offered the service on the date that the fees or charges become due and payable. No real or personal property shall be sold to satisfy any lien imposed under this section. The municipality shall mail a notice of the lien, including the amount of unpaid fees or charges and a description of the property subject to the lien, to the owner of the property subject to the lien. (c)  The municipal governing body shall notify the county tax collector of any unpaid fees or charges assessed under this section within ninety (90) days after such fees or charges are due.  Upon receipt of a delinquency notice, the tax collector shall not issue or renew a motor vehicle road and bridge privilege license for any motor vehicle owned by a person who is delinquent in the payment of fees or charges, unless such fees or charges, in addition to any other taxes or fees assessed against the motor vehicle, are paid. (d)  Liens created under this section may be discharged as follows: (i)  By filing with the municipal tax collector a receipt or acknowledgement, signed by the municipality, that the lien has been paid or discharged; or (ii)  By depositing with the municipal tax collector money equal to the amount of the claim, which money shall be held for the benefit of the municipality. SECTION 5.  Section 27-41-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-41-59.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 27-41-2, on the first Monday of April, if the tax collector has exercised his option to hold a tax sale on that day, and on the last Monday of August, as the case may be, if the taxes remain unpaid, the tax collector shall proceed to sell, for the payment of taxes then remaining due and unpaid, together with all fees, penalties and damages provided by law, the land or so much and such parts of the land of each delinquent taxpayer to the highest and best bidder for cash as will pay the amount of taxes due by him and all costs and charges.  He shall first offer one hundred sixty (160) acres or a smaller separately described subdivision, if the land is less than one hundred sixty (160) acres.  If the first parcel so offered does not produce the amount due, then he shall offer as an entirety all the land constituting one (1) tract.  Each separate assessment as it appears and is described on the assessment roll shall constitute one (1) tract for the purpose of sale for taxes, notwithstanding the fact that the person who is the owner thereof, or to whom it is assessed, is the owner of or is assessed with other lands, the whole of which constitutes one (1) entire tract but appears on the assessment roll in separate subdivisions.  Upon offering the land of any delinquent taxpayer constituting one (1) tract, if no person will bid for it, the whole amount of taxes and all costs incident to the sale, the tax collector shall strike it off to the state.  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the sale shall be continued from day to day within the hours from 8:30 o'clock in the forenoon and 4:30 o'clock in the afternoon until completed. (2)  The tax collector is authorized to enter into an agreement with an online provider to conduct tax sales using online bidding and sale.  Such agreement must be ratified by the county board of supervisors in order to be binding.  Upon ratification of the agreement by the county board of supervisors, the tax collector may conduct the tax sale online as provided in this section.  The time during which online bids can be made at a tax sale conducted under this subsection shall be established in the agreement and, if the tax sale is to be conducted using the procedure authorized by this subsection, the time during which online bids can be made at the sale shall be included in the advertisement required by Section 27-41-55. In counties having two (2) court districts, the online tax sale shall separate the court districts into two (2) separate portals to distinguish each district. (3)  A failure to advertise, an error in the advertisement, or an error in conducting the sale shall not invalidate a sale at the proper time and place for taxes of any land on which the taxes were due and not paid, but a sale made at the wrong time or at the wrong place shall be void.  Any person sustaining damages by reason of any failure or error by the tax collector may recover damages therefor on his official bond. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.